Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2335
Incorporation by reference.

Any writing in existence when a will is executed may be incorporated by reference if the language of the will manifests this intent and describes the writing sufficiently to permit its identification.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 57, UPC § 2-510.